Utah statutes.
26-20-11.   Presumption based on paid state warrant -- Value of medical benefits -- Repayment of benefits.

(1)  In any civil or criminal action brought under this chapter, a paid state warrant, made payable to the order of a party, creates a presumption that the party received funds from the state.

(2)  In any civil or criminal action brought under this chapter, the value of the benefits received shall be the ordinary or usual charge for similar benefits in the private sector.

(3)  In any criminal action under this chapter, the repayment of funds or other benefits obtained in violation of the provisions of this chapter does not constitute a defense to, or grounds for dismissal of that action.

